New York, session 2025-2026, A1770.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1266 of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 20 to read as follows: 3 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authority and any 4 of its subsidiary corporations shall establish and implement a discount 5 fare rate program, such discount to be no less than twenty-five percent 6 of the regular fare, for full-time undergraduate students attending an 7 accredited college. The discount fare rate program established and 8 implemented pursuant to this subdivision shall be in operation during 9 all hours in which such authority provides railroad, subway and/or omni- 10 bus services, and such program shall not be limited in operation to 11 off-peak hours or to any other hours designated by the authority or its 12 subsidiary corporations. The chairman shall establish and implement all 13 rules and regulations necessary to effectuate this subdivision. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 15 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04785-01-5